somali/somali.xfst
define Consonant b | c | d | f | g | h | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z | ɖ | ʃ | ɣ | β | ð | ʐ | h̵ | ʕ;
define Vowel a | e | i | o | u;
define jConsonant Consonant | j; 

define VowelInsertionA [..] -> a || a Consonant _ jConsonant [.#. | [t a j .#.] | [t a .#.] | [n a j .#.]];
define VowelInsertionE [..] -> e || e Consonant _ jConsonant [.#. | [t a j .#.] | [t a .#.] | [n a j .#.]];
define VowelInsertionI [..] -> i || i Consonant _ jConsonant [.#. | [t a j .#.] | [t a .#.] | [n a j .#.]];
define VowelInsertionO [..] -> o || o Consonant _ jConsonant [.#. | [t a j .#.] | [t a .#.] | [n a j .#.]];
define VowelInsertionU [..] -> u || u Consonant _ jConsonant [.#. | [t a j .#.] | [t a .#.] | [n a j .#.]];

define MNFormChange m -> n || _ [.#. | [t a .#.] | [t a j .#.] | [n a j .#.]];

define Spirantization b -> β,
                      d -> ð,
                      g -> ɣ,
                      ɖ -> ʐ || Vowel _ Vowel;

define DTDeletion t -> 0 || [d | ɖ] _ a;


define Shaification [l t] -> [ʃ] || _ [a .#. | [a j .#.]] ;


define LNAJConversion [l n a j] -> [l l a j] || _ .#.;


define VI VowelInsertionA .o. VowelInsertionE .o. VowelInsertionI .o. VowelInsertionO .o. VowelInsertionU;
read regex VI .o.  MNFormChange .o. Spirantization .o. DTDeletion .o. LNAJConversion .o. Shaification;
# save stack somali.fst
